Washington statutes.
RCW 39.62.040

Unauthorized use—Penalty.

Any person who with intent to defraud uses on a public security or an instrument of payment:

(1) A facsimile signature, or any reproduction of it, of any authorized officer, or

(2) Any facsimile seal, or any reproduction of it, of this state or any of its departments, agencies, counties, cities, towns, municipal corporations, junior taxing districts, school districts, or other instrumentalities or of any of its political subdivisions is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2003 c 53 s 213; 1969 c 86 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.